Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1811
Indictment defective; accused committed or held to bail.

When a motion to quash, or a plea in abatement, has been adjudged in favor of the accused, he may be committed or held to bail in such sum as the court may require for his appearance at the first day of the next term of said court.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 443, p. 822;

R.S.1913, § 9087;

C.S.1922, § 10112;

C.S.1929, § 29-1810;

R.S.1943, § 29-1811.

Order of district court sustaining motion to quash information does not operate to discharge the defendant. Dobrusky v. State, 140 Neb. 360, 299 N.W. 539 (1941).